Utah statutes.
31A-21-103.   Capacity to contract.

Any person 16 years of age or older who is otherwise competent to contract under Utah law, and who is not subject to any legal disability, may contract for insurance.  If there is a conservator appointed under Title 75, the conservator, rather than the person whose property is subject to the conservatorship, may contract for insurance to protect the property under conservatorship.  In the case of a conservatorship over the person or property of a person under 16 years of age, the conservator may invest funds of the estate in life or accident and health insurance or annuity contracts, but only with the approval of the court having jurisdiction over the conservatorship.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

